test/src/morphology/pronouns_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Pronouns. abesijvva ja partitijvva?

Tests:
  Pronoun - mån: # Personal
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Nom: mån 
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Gen: muv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Acc: muv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ine: mujna 
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: munji
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ela: mujsta
    mån+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Com: mujna 
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Nom: [måj, mådja]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Gen: munnu
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: munnuv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ine: munnun
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ill: munnuj
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Ela: munnus
    mån+Pron+Pers+Du1+Com: munnujn
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Nom: [mij, midja]
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Gen: mijá
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Acc: mijáv
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ine: miján
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: midjij
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ela: mijás
    mån+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: mijáj
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Nom: dån 
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Gen: duv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Acc: duv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ine: dujna 
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ill: dunji
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ela: dujsta
    dån+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Com: dujna 
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Nom: [dåj, dådja]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Gen: dunnu
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Acc: dunnuv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ine: dunnun
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ill: dunnuj
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Ela: dunnus
    dån+Pron+Pers+Du2+Com: dunnujn
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Nom: [dij, didja]
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Gen: dijá
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Acc: dijáv
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ine: diján
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ill: didjij
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ela: dijás
    dån+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Com: dijáj
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: sån 
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: suv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: suv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: sujna 
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: sunji
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: sujsta
    sån+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: sujna 
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Nom: [såj, sådja]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Gen: sunnu
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Acc: sunnuv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Ine: sunnun
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Ill: sunnuj
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Ela: sunnus
    sån+Pron+Pers+Du3+Com: sunnujn
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: [sij, sidja]
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: sijá
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: sijáv
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine: siján
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: sidjij
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: sijás
    sån+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: sijáj
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Nom: dat 
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Gen: dan
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Acc: dav
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ine: danna 
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: dasi
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ela: dassta
    dat+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Com: dajna
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Nom: da
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Gen: daj
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Acc: dajt
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ine: dajn 
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: dajda
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ela: dajs
    dat+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: daj

  Pronoun - dat: # demonstrative
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dat 
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dan
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dav
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: danna 
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dasi
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: dassta
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dajna
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: da
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: daj
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dajt
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dajn 
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dajda
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dajs
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: daj

  Pronoun - duot: # demonstrative
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: [dát, dáhta] 
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: [dán, dáŋga]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: [dáv, dávva]
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: dánna
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dási
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: dássta
    dát+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dájna
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dá 
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: dáj
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dájt
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dájn 
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dájda
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dájs
    dát+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: dáj

  Pronoun - dakkir: # dakkárcase
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dakkir
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dakkira
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dakkirav
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: dakkirin 
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dakkirij
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: dakkiris
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dakkirijn
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dakkira
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: dakkirij
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dakkirijt
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dakkirijn 
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dakkirijda
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dakkirijs
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: dakkirij
    dakkir+Pron+Dem+Ess: dakkirin

  Pronoun - dakkárasj: # dakkárcase
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dakkárasj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dakkárattja
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dakkárattjav
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ine: dakkárattjan 
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dakkáradtjaj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ela: dakkárattjas
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dakkárattjajn
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dakkárattja
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: dakkárattjaj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Acc: dakkárattjajt
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ine: dakkárattjajn 
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: dakkárattjajda
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ela: dakkárattjajs
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: dakkárattjaj
    dakkárasj+Pron+Dem+Ess: dakkáradtjan

  Pronoun - iesj: # reflexive
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom: iesj
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom: ietja
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Pl+Nom: ietja
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg1: ietjam
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg2: ietjat
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg3: ietjas
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxDu1: ietjama
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxDu2: ietjada
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxDu3: ietjaska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl1: ietjama
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl2: ietjada
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl3: ietjasa
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxSg1: ietjanam
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxSg2: ietjanit
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxSg3: ietjanis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxDu1: ietjanimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxDu2: ietjanihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxDu3: ietjaniska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxPl1: ietjanimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxPl2: ietjanihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxPl3: ietjanisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg1: allasim
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg2: allasit
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg3: allasis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu1: allasimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu2: allasihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3: allasiska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxPl1: allasimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxPl2: allasihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxPl3: allasisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxSg1: ietjastam
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxSg2: ietjastit
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxSg3: ietjastis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxDu1: ietjastimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxDu2: ietjastihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxDu3: ietjastiska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxPl1: ietjastimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxPl2: ietjastihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxPl3: ietjastisá
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxSg1: ietjajnam
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxSg2: ietjajnit
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxSg3: ietjajnis
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxDu1: ietjajnimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxDu2: ietjajnihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxDu3: ietjajniska
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl1: ietjajnimme
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl2: ietjajnihtte
    iesj+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl3: ietjajnisá

  Pronoun - gaskan: # Resiprocal
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxSg1: []
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxSg2: []
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxSg3: []
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxDu1: gaskanimme
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxDu2: gaskanihtte
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxDu3: gaskaniska
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxPl1: gaskanimme
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxPl2: gaskanihtte
    gaskan+Pron+Recipr+PxPl3: gaskanisá

  Pronoun - mij: # Relative
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: mij
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: man
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: mav
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine: manna
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: masi
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela: massta
    mij+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: majna
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: ma
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: maj
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: majt
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine: majn
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: majda
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela: majs
    mij+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: maj
    mij+Pron+Rel+Ess: manen

  Pronoun - gut: # Relative
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: [gut, guhti]
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: gen
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: gev
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine: gænna
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: gesi
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela: gæssta
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: gejna
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: gudi
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: gej
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: gejt
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine: gejn
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: gejda
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela: gejs
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: gej
    guhti+Pron+Rel+Ess: genna

  Pronoun - makkir: # interrogativ
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: makkir
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: makkira
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: makkirav
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: makkirin
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: makkirij
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: makkiris
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: makkirijn
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: makkira
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: makkirij
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: makkirijt
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: makkirijn
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: makkirijda
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: makkirijs
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: makkirij
    makkir+Pron+Interr+Ess: makkirin

  Pronoun - galla: # interrogativ
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: galla
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: galle
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: gallev
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: gallen
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: galláj
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: galles
    galla+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: gallijn
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: galle
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: gallij
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: gallijt
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: gallijn
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: gallijda
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: gallijs
    galla+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: gallij

  Pronoun - guhtimusj: # interrogativ
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom: guhtimusj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Gen: guhtimuttja
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Acc: guhtimuttjav
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ine: guhtimuttjan
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ill: guhtimudtjaj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Ela: guhtimuttjas
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Sg+Com: guhtimuttjajn
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom: guhtimuttja
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Gen: guhtimuttjaj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Acc: guhtimuttjajt
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ine: guhtimuttjajn
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ill: guhtimuttjajda
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Ela: guhtimuttjajs
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Pl+Com: guhtimuttjaj
    guhtimusj+Pron+Interr+Ess: guhtimudtjan

  Pronoun - goabbá: # relative
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: goabbá
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: goappá
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: goappáv
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ine: goappán
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: goabbáj
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ela: goappás
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: goappájn
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: goappá
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: goappáj
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Acc: goappájt
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ine: goappájn
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: goappájda
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ela: goappájs
    goabbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: goappáj

  Pronoun - goappásj: # relative
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: goappásj
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: goappátja
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: goappátjav
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: goappátjin
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: goappátjij
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: goappátjis
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: goappátjijn
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: goappátja
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: goappátjij
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: goappátjijt
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: goappátjijn
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: goappátjijda
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: goappátjijs
    goappásj+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: goappátjij

  Pronoun - goappátjagá: # Indefinite
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: goappátjagá
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: goappátjagáj
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: goappátjagájt
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine: goappátjagájn
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: goappátjagájda
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela: goappátjagájs
    goappátjagá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: goappátjagáj
